Washington statutes.
RCW 18.165.160

Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the director may take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter;

(2) Making a material misstatement or omission in the application for or renewal of a firearms certificate, including falsifying requested identification information;

(3) Not meeting the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.165.030, 18.165.040, or 18.165.050;

(4) Failing to return immediately on demand a firearm issued by an employer;

(5) Carrying a firearm in the performance of his or her duties if not the holder of a valid armed private investigator license, or carrying a firearm not meeting the provisions of this chapter while in the performance of his or her duties;

(6) Failing to return immediately on demand company identification, badges, or other items issued to the private investigator by an employer;

(7) Making any statement that would reasonably cause another person to believe that the private investigator is a sworn peace officer;

(8) Divulging confidential information obtained in the course of any investigation to which he or she was assigned;

(9) Acceptance of employment that is adverse to a client or former client and relates to a matter about which a licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of the licensee's employment by the client;

(10) Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.165.050;

(11) Assisting a client to locate, trace, or contact a person when the investigator knows that the client is prohibited by any court order from harassing or contacting the person whom the investigator is being asked to locate, trace, or contact, as it pertains to domestic violence, stalking, or minor children;

(12) Failure to maintain bond or insurance;

(13) Failure to have a qualifying principal in place; or

(14) Being certified as not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320.

[ 2002 c 86 s 245; 1997 c 58 s 835; 1995 c 277 s 34; 1991 c 328 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.